South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S384.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1. Section 1 of Act 108 of 2021 is amended to read: SECTION  1. There is established and recognized, within Greenville County, the Blue Ridge Community, which is comprised of the parcel of real property located within the following boundaries: beginning at the boundary between South Carolina and North Carolina where the boundary intersects with Highway 25 intersection of Beaver Dam Road, Old Highway 25, and Highway 25, traveling southward along Highway 25 to its intersection with Highway 290, eastward on Highway 290 to its intersection with Highway 253, northward on Highway 253 to its intersection with Fews Bridge Road, eastward on Fews Bridge Road to its intersection with East Tyger Bridge Road, northward on East Tyger Bridge Road to the intersection with Highway 101, northward on Highway 101 to its intersection with Highway 912, westerly on Highway 912 until it turns into Calahan Mountain Road, westerly on Calahan Mountain Road to its intersection with Old Highway 25, southward on Old Highway 25 to its intersection with Beaver Dam Road and Highway 25. Hall Road, northward on Hall Road to its intersection with Noe Road, northward on Noe Road to its intersection with Lindsey Bridge Road, westward on Lindsey Bridge Road to its intersection with Mountain View Road, northward on Mountain View Road to its intersection with Camp Creek Road, eastward on Camp Creek Road to its intersection with South Packs Road, southward on South Packs Road to its intersection with North Blue Ridge Road, southward on North Blue Ridge Road to its intersection with East Tyger Bridge Road, eastward on East Tyger Bridge Road to its intersection with Highway 101, southward on Highway 101 to its intersection with Edwards Lake Road, eastward on Edwards Lake Road to its intersection with Berry Mill Road, eastward on Berry Mill Road to its intersection with Mount Lebanon Church Road, southward then eastward on Mount Lebanon Church Road to its boundary with Spartanburg County, northward along the boundary with Spartanburg County to the boundary between South Carolina and North Carolina, and westward along the boundary between South Carolina and North Carolina to Highway 25 where Highway 25 crosses the boundary between South Carolina and North Carolina. SECTION 2.  (A) For the purposes of this act, "cluster decentralized wastewater treatment system" means a septic treatment system under some form of common ownership that collects wastewater from two or more dwellings or other buildings that conveys the wastewater to a treatment and dispersal system located on a suitable site near the dwellings or other buildings. (B) Cluster decentralized wastewater treatment systems may not be installed in the Blue Ridge Community after the effective date of this act. SECTION 3.  If any section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph, sentence, clause, phrase, or word of this act is for any reason held to be unconstitutional or invalid, such holding shall not affect the constitutionality or validity of the remaining portions of this act, the General Assembly hereby declaring that it would have passed this act, and each and every section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph, sentence, clause, phrase, and word thereof, irrespective of the fact that any one or more other sections, subsections, paragraphs, subparagraphs, sentences, clauses, phrases, or words hereof may be declared to be unconstitutional, invalid, or otherwise ineffective. SECTION 4.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----